Alabama, session 2026rs, SB74.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
65 Section 1. Sections 16-5-50, 16-5-51, 16-5-52, 16-5-53,
66 16-5-54, 16-5-54.1, 16-5-55, and 16-5-56 of the Code of
67 Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
68 "§16-5-50
69 The Alabama Math and Science Teacher Education Program
70 is created pursuant to this article is renamed the Loan
71 Assistance in Support of Educators in Alabama (LASEA)
72 Program."
73 "§16-5-51
74 The purpose of the Alabama Math and Science Teacher
75 Education Program Loan Assistance in Support of Educators in
76 Alabama Program is twofold as follows:
77 (1) To encourage individuals to enroll in and complete
78 educator programs leading to identified as having acute
79 educator shortages and obtain Alabama certification in
80 mathematics, science, or computer science those programs.
81 (2) To improve the educational system in Alabama by
82 encouraging those who complete the program and obtain
83 certification in acute educator shortage programs to accept
84 math, science, or computer science teaching educator positions
Page 3

math, science, or computer science teaching educator positions
SB74 INTRODUCED
85 in Alabama public K-12 schools, preferably in public or school
86 systems, including charter schools, where the shortage of
87 math, science, or computer science teachers, or any
88 combination of the three, is most acute, or in a school that
89 has been designated as a failing school, or any other term
90 adopted to identify an underperforming school, by the State
91 Board of Education or the Legislature that have been
92 identified as acute educator shortage locations."
93 "§16-5-52
94 For the purposes of this article, the following terms
95 shall have the following meanings:
96 (1) ACUTE EDUCATOR SHORTAGE. A shortage of certified
97 educators in identified educator programs as determined by the
98 Alabama Commission on Higher Education in consultation with
99 the State Department of Education and the Alabama Commission
100 on the Evaluation of Services.
101 (2) ACUTE EDUCATOR SHORTAGE LOCATION. A public K-12
102 school or school system that has been identified as having an
103 acute educator shortage.
104 (1)(3) APPROVED INSTITUTION. A state-supported
105 institution of higher education or a private nonprofit
106 institution of higher education that satisfies all of the
107 following:
108 a. Is accredited by the Southern Association of
109 Colleges and Schools Commission on Colleges.
110 b. Is approved by the State Board of Education to
111 prepare teachers of middle level or secondary math, science,
112 or computer science educators in programs identified as having
Page 4

or computer science educators in programs identified as having
SB74 INTRODUCED
113 an acute educator shortage.
114 c. Is eligible to receive Title IV federal student aid
115 program funds.
116 d. Maintains its primary headquarters in Alabama.
117 (4) BASE SUPPORT. Loan assistance in support of
118 educators who are certified in a program identified as having
119 an acute educator shortage pursuant to Section 16-5-54.
120 (2)(5) CHARTER SCHOOL. A form of public K-12 school. A
121 teacher established pursuant to Chapter 6F. An educator
122 employed by a charter school accredited by the Southern
123 Association of Colleges and Schools Commission on Colleges is
124 eligible to participate in the program. A teacher for the base
125 support provided in this article. An educator employed by a
126 charter school is not eligible for the acute shortage area
127 supplement supplemental support provided in this article.
128 (3)(6) COMMISSION. The Alabama Commission on Higher
129 Education.
130 (7) EDUCATOR. A full-time employee of a public K-12
131 school or school system whose function is to work with
132 students in support of their efforts to learn and obtain an
133 education.
134 (4)(8) ELIGIBLE APPLICANT. A person An individual who
135 satisfies the criteria set out in this article and is eligible
136 under rules adopted by the commission.
137 (5)(9) PROGRAM. The Alabama Math and Science Teacher
138 Education Program Loan Assistance in Support of Educators in
139 Alabama Program created by this article and administered by
140 the commission that provides loan repayments assistance to a
Page 5

the commission that provides loan repayments assistance to a
SB74 INTRODUCED
141 teacher an educator with a valid Alabama professional educator
142 certificate who is endorsed in math, science, or computer
143 science who teaches math, science, or computer science courses
144 for which the teacher is properly certified for three-fourths
145 of the full-time teaching load in the Alabama public school
146 system a program identified as having an acute educator
147 shortage.
148 (6) SCIENCE. Biology, chemistry, physics, and general
149 science.
150 (10) SUPPLEMENTAL SUPPORT. Loan assistance in support
151 of educators who qualify for base support pursuant to Section
152 16-5-54 and are employed in an acute educator shortage
153 location.
154 (7)(11) YEAR. A school year that shall be divided into
155 The fall and spring semesters. The term does not mean
156 calendar, fiscal, or scholastic year of an academic year of a
157 public K-12 school or school system."
158 "§16-5-53
159 (a) The Alabama Math and Science Teacher Education
160 Program program shall be administered by the commission, which
161 may adopt any rules necessary for the administration of the
162 program.
163 (b) A percentage of any annual appropriations received
164 by the program, not to exceed 10 percent, may be expended for
165 its operation and maintenance. Any funds appropriated to the
166 program shall be non-reverting at the end of each fiscal year.
167 (c) The determination of acute educator shortages and
168 acute educator shortage locations shall be made at least once
Page 6

acute educator shortage locations shall be made at least once
SB74 INTRODUCED
169 every academic year."
170 "§16-5-54
171 (a) The program shall provide two levels of payment for
172 loan assistance: (i) base support in the amount of seven
173 thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) per year worked or
174 three thousand seven hundred fifty dollars ($3,750) per
175 semester, for a maximum of four consecutive years, and (ii)
176 supplemental support in the amount of three thousand dollars
177 ($3,000) per year worked or one thousand five hundred dollars
178 ($1,500) per semester worked, for a maximum of four
179 consecutive years. Depending on eligibility, an eligible
180 applicant may receive the base support or both the base
181 support and supplemental support.
182 (b) To be eligible for the base program of three
183 thousand seven hundred fifty dollars ($3,750) per semester for
184 math and science teachers and one thousand five hundred
185 dollars ($1,500) per semester for computer science teachers,
186 an support an eligible applicant shall satisfy all of the
187 following:
188 (1) Is a citizen or a lawful permanent resident of the
189 United States.
190 (2) Is a resident of Alabama. The commission shall
191 accept any one of the following as proof of residency:
192 a. A current valid Alabama driver license.
193 b. A current valid Alabama vehicle registration.
194 c. A current valid Alabama voter registration card.
195 (1) Be(3) Is a graduate of a State Board of Education
196 an approved program in math, science, or computer science, at
Page 7

an approved program in math, science, or computer science, at
SB74 INTRODUCED
197 the baccalaureate or master's level after the 2018 spring
198 semester term from an approved Alabama institution and hold an
199 initial middle level or secondary professional educator
200 certificate endorsed in math, science, or computer science
201 that was has been issued an Alabama educator certificate based
202 upon completion of the approved program in math, science, or
203 computer science. A teacher identified as having an acute
204 educator shortage. An educator who only earns a passing score
205 on the Praxis test in math, science, or computer science to
206 add a certificate endorsement for math, science, or computer
207 science, an approved program and who has not completed an
208 entire the approved program, does not satisfy this
209 requirement.
210 (2) Holds a valid Alabama professional educator
211 certificate endorsed in middle level or secondary math,
212 science, or computer science, or any combination of the three.
213 (3) Teaches
214 (4) Is employed by a public K-12 school or school
215 system.
216 (5) Maintains a schedule in which at least
217 three-fourths of the full-time teaching load is comprised of
218 math, science, or computer science in an Alabama public school
219 system workload addresses an acute educator shortage.
220 (4) Is a citizen or a lawful permanent resident of the
221 United States.
222 (5) Is a resident of Alabama and provides documentation
223 proving a permanent connection to the State of Alabama. The
224 commission shall accept any one of the following as proof of
Page 8

commission shall accept any one of the following as proof of
SB74 INTRODUCED
225 residency:
226 a. A current valid Alabama driver license.
227 b. A current valid Alabama vehicle registration.
228 c. A current valid Alabama voter registration card.
229 (6) Has outstanding federal student loans, subsidized
230 or unsubsidized.
231 (7) Satisfies additional continuing eligibility
232 criteria established by the commission.
233 (b) In order to receive an additional supplement
234 pursuant to this article, in addition to the criteria listed
235 in subsection (a), a recipient shall also teach math, science,
236 or computer science, or any combination of the three, in a
237 public school system within the state with an acute teacher
238 shortage in math, science, or computer science, or any
239 combination of the three, for which the teacher is properly
240 certified, as identified by the commission in consultation
241 with the Alabama State Department of Education or in a school
242 that has been designated as a failing school, or any other
243 term adopted to identify an underperforming school, by the
244 Alabama State Board of Education or the Legislature.(c) To be
245 eligible for the supplemental support an eligible applicant
246 must meet the criteria listed in subsection (b) and also be
247 employed in an acute educator shortage location."
248 "§16-5-54.1
249 (a) Beginning in the fall semester of 2021, the
250 benefits outlined in subsection (a) of Section 16-5-54(a) and
251 the criteria outlined in Section 16-5-54(b) and (c) shall also
252 apply to the following eligible individuals, pending
Page 9

apply to the following eligible individuals, pending
SB74 INTRODUCED
253 authorization to teach who are authorized to be educators in
254 Alabama and subsequent employment are subsequently employed in
255 an Alabama public K-12 school: or school system, who graduated
256 from a regionally accredited college or university in another
257 state at the baccalaureate or master's level after the 2021
258 spring semester term, and who may or may not reside within
259 Alabama, exempting Section 16-5-54(b)(2).
260 (1) An individual who graduated from a regionally
261 accredited college or university in Alabama or in another
262 state who is certified to teach math, science, or computer
263 science in another state, and who may or may not reside within
264 Alabama.
265 (2) An individual who resides in another state and is a
266 graduate of a State Board of Education approved program in
267 math, science, or computer science, at the baccalaureate or
268 master's level after the 2021 spring semester term from an
269 approved Alabama institution and who holds an initial
270 middle-level or secondary professional educator certificate
271 endorsed in math, science, or computer science that was issued
272 based upon completion of the approved program in math,
273 science, or computer science. A teacher who only earns a
274 passing score on the Praxis test in math, science, or computer
275 science to add a certificate endorsement for math, science, or
276 computer science and who has not completed an entire approved
277 program, does not satisfy this requirement.
278 (b) The individuals listed in subsection (a) shall also
279 satisfy all of the following criteria:
280 (1) Hold a valid Alabama professional educator
Page 10

(1) Hold a valid Alabama professional educator
SB74 INTRODUCED
281 certificate endorsed in middle-level or secondary math,
282 science, or computer science, or any combination of the three.
283 (2) Teach a schedule in which at least three-fourths of
284 the full-time teaching load is comprised of math, science, or
285 computer science courses for which the teacher is properly
286 certified in an Alabama public school system.
287 (3) Be citizens or lawful permanent residents of the
288 United States.
289 (4) Have outstanding federal student loans, subsidized
290 or unsubsidized.
291 (5) Satisfy additional continuing eligibility criteria
292 established by the commission.
293 (c) In order to receive an additional supplement
294 pursuant to this article, in addition to the criteria listed
295 in subsections (a) and (b), a recipient shall also teach math,
296 science, or computer science courses, or any combination of
297 the three, for which he or she is properly certified, in a
298 school system within the state with an acute teacher shortage
299 in math, science, or computer science, or any combination of
300 the three, as identified by the commission in consultation
301 with the State Department of Education or in a school that has
302 been designated as a failing school, or any other term
303 subsequently adopted to identify underperforming schools, by
304 the State Board of Education or the Legislature."
305 "§16-5-55
306 (a) The program shall be used to provide a loan
307 repayment for federal student loans in the following amounts:
308 (1)a. Prior to the 2022 fall semester, five thousand
Page 11

(1)a. Prior to the 2022 fall semester, five thousand
SB74 INTRODUCED
309 dollars ($5,000) per year, or two thousand five hundred
310 dollars ($2,500) per semester worked, for a maximum of four
311 consecutive years for a teacher with a valid Alabama
312 professional educator certificate endorsed in middle level or
313 secondary math or science who graduated from a teacher
314 education program at an approved institution after the 2018
315 spring semester term and is teaching in an Alabama public
316 school.
317 b. Three thousand dollars ($3,000) per year, or one
318 thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) per semester worked,
319 for a maximum of four consecutive years for a teacher with a
320 valid Alabama professional educator certificate endorsed in
321 computer science who graduated from a teacher education
322 program at an approved institution after the 2021 spring
323 semester term and is teaching in an Alabama public school.
324 c. Beginning after the 2022 spring semester, seven
325 thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) per year, or three
326 thousand seven hundred fifty dollars ($3,750) per semester
327 worked, for a maximum of four consecutive years for a teacher
328 with a valid Alabama professional educator certificate
329 endorsed in middle level or secondary math or science who
330 graduated from a teacher education program at an approved
331 institution after the 2018 spring semester term and is
332 teaching in an Alabama public school. Payments made under this
333 paragraph may only be made to eligible teachers who fulfilled
334 the per semester requirements for the 2022 fall semester and
335 forward.
336 (2)a. An additional two thousand five hundred dollars
Page 12

(2)a. An additional two thousand five hundred dollars
SB74 INTRODUCED
337 ($2,500) per year, or one thousand two hundred fifty dollars
338 ($1,250) per semester worked, for a maximum of four
339 consecutive years for a teacher who satisfies all criteria
340 listed in Sections 16-5-54, 16-5-54.1, and 16-5-54.2, and who
341 also is teaching math or science in a public school in a
342 school system within the state with an acute teacher shortage
343 in math or science, or both, as identified by the commission
344 in consultation with the Alabama State Department of Education
345 or in a school that has been designated as a failing school,
346 or any other term adopted to identify an underperforming
347 school by the Alabama State Board of Education or the
348 Legislature.
349 b. An additional one thousand dollars ($1,000) per
350 year, or five hundred dollars ($500) per semester worked, for
351 a maximum of four consecutive years for a teacher who
352 satisfies all criteria listed in Sections 16-5-54, 16-5-54.1,
353 and 16-5-54.2, and who also is teaching computer science in a
354 public school in a school system within the state with an
355 acute teacher shortage in computer science as identified by
356 the commission in consultation with the Alabama State
357 Department of Education or in a school that has been
358 designated as a failing school, or any other term adopted to
359 identify an underperforming school, by the Alabama State Board
360 of Education or the Legislature.
361 (b) Loan repayment award recipients shall reapply for
362 the program annually.
363 (a) Program funds shall be awarded and distributed by
364 the commission in the following manner:
Page 13

the commission in the following manner:
SB74 INTRODUCED
365 (c)(1) Loan repayment assistance awards shall be
366 distributed directly to the recipient teacher eligible
367 applicants in two disbursements during the applicable year:
368 One disbursement shall be made after January 1 and the second
369 disbursement shall be made after June 1. Each recipient
370 eligible applicant shall provide documentation from the
371 employing public K-12 school or school system as proof that he
372 or she has taught for a of employment for the requested
373 semester. If the award amount is larger than exceeds the
374 outstanding loan balance, the award amount shall be reduced to
375 the amount of match the loan balance.
376 (d) The requirements of this article are contingent
377 upon available funding for the program.
378 (e)(2) The commission shall determine the necessary
379 procedures for awarding loan repayments assistance if the
380 number of total awards made to eligible applicants and
381 recipients exceeds available funding.
382 (f)(3) The recipient eligible applicant shall notify
383 the commission in writing of any change in status within 30
384 days after the change. Failure to notify the commission of a
385 change in status shall affect future eligibility. All of the
386 following constitute a change in status:
387 (1)a. A change in name.
388 (2)b. A change in residence.
389 (3)c. A change in employment status.
390 (g)(4) To receive a loan repayment check assistance
391 pursuant to this article, a teacher an eligible applicant
392 shall register online with the state Comptroller.
Page 14

shall register online with the state Comptroller.
SB74 INTRODUCED
393 (b) The requirements of this article are contingent
394 upon available funding for the program.
395 (h)(c) A loan repayment check assistance award is
396 considered income by the Internal Revenue Service, and
397 recipients eligible applicants shall be made aware of that
398 fact.
399 (i) Any funds appropriated to the program shall be
400 nonreverting.
401 (j) Additional funds shall be made available to
402 teachers who also teach math, science, or computer science in
403 school systems of the state where the shortages of math,
404 science, or computer science teachers, or any combination of
405 the three, are most severe. The commission, in consultation
406 with the Alabama State Department of Education, shall
407 determine which school systems in the state have the greatest
408 shortage areas.
409 (k) A recipient who receives a loan repayment award and
410 continues to satisfy employment criteria shall continue to
411 receive an award for the four-year limit regardless of whether
412 the employing school system retains its acute shortage
413 designation or the employing school is removed from the
414 failing school list. If a recipient leaves an acute shortage
415 system or a failing school and accepts employment in a school
416 system or school that does not hold an acute shortage system
417 or failing school designation, the recipient shall no longer
418 qualify to receive supplemental funds.
419 (d) An eligible applicant who receives the base support
420 and continues to satisfy employment criteria shall continue to
Page 15

and continues to satisfy employment criteria shall continue to
SB74 INTRODUCED
421 receive an award for the four-year limit.
422 (e) An eligible applicant who receives the supplemental
423 support and continues to satisfy employment criteria shall
424 continue to receive an award for the four-year limit."
425 "§16-5-56
426 Any person individual or institution aggrieved by not
427 satisfied with the actions of the commission in its
428 administration of the program, by may submit a written
429 petition filed with to the commission within 30 days after
430 notice of the action complained of, may request a rehearing by
431 the commission. If not satisfied with the response of the
432 commission to the written petition, the individual or
433 institution may request a rehearing within 20 days after the
434 response of the commission is made. The commission shall
435 schedule the requested rehearing not less than 20, nor more
436 than 30, within 20 days after receipt of the petition
437 rehearing request. The aggrieved party individual or
438 institution may present written and oral evidence supporting
439 its the petition and may be represented by counsel. The
440 decision of the commission following the rehearing shall be is
441 final."
442 Section 2. Sections 16-5-53.1 and16-5-53.2 are added to
443 the Code of Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
444 §16-5-53.1
445 (a) The commission shall develop an accountability and
446 evaluation plan for the program that does all of the
447 following:
448 (1) Identifies the goals, objectives, and expected
Page 16

(1) Identifies the goals, objectives, and expected
SB74 INTRODUCED
449 outputs and outcomes of the program.
450 (2) Describes the specific activities of the program
451 and how those activities will achieve expected outcomes.
452 (3) Defines what the expected metrics of success shall
453 be and provides a monitoring plan to regularly assess
454 performance.
455 (4) Provides an evaluation plan to assess the impact of
456 expected outcomes.
457 (b) The commission shall consult with the Alabama
458 Commission on the Evaluation of Services on the development of
459 the accountability and evaluation plan.
460 §16-5-53.2
461 Any eligible applicant who met the requirements of the
462 program and received a loan repayment prior to August 1, 2026,
463 shall remain eligible for loan repayments pursuant to the
464 requirements of the program as long as they remain
465 continuously employed with a qualifying school.
466 Section 3. Section 16-5-54.2, Code of Alabama 1975,
467 relating to documentation required from educators who received
468 their certifications pursuant to an alternative certification
469 program to receive loan repayments under AMSTEP, is repealed.
470 Section 4. This act shall become effective on August 1,
471 2026.
Page 17